District of Columbia statutes.
24-401c

Application for reduction of sentence.

When by reason of his training and response to the rehabilitation program of the Department of Corrections it appears to the Board that there is a reasonable probability that a prisoner will live and remain at liberty without violating the law, and that his immediate release is not incompatible with the welfare of society, but he has not served his minimum sentence, the Board in its discretion may apply to the court imposing sentence for a reduction of his minimum sentence. The court shall have jurisdiction to act upon the application at any time prior to the expiration of the minimum sentence and no hearing shall be required. If a prisoner is serving a sentence for a crime for which a minimum sentence is prescribed by § 24-403(b) his minimum sentence shall not be reduced under this section below the minimum sentence so prescribed.

July 17, 1947, 61 Stat. 379, ch. 263, § 4
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 92, ch. 159, § 201(b)
1981 Ed., § 24-201c.
1973 Ed., § 24-201c.